Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 2. Fire Prevention and Fire Safety

§ 35-9-106.
Powers and duties of council.

The council shall adopt rules and regulations to:

Establish minimum fire standards not exceeding the standards prescribed by the International Fire Code, the International Building Code, the International Mechanical Code, the International Existing Building Code and the International Fuel Gas Code for:

All new building construction or remodeling under W.S. 35-9-108(a);

The prevention of fire and the protection of life and property from fire and panic in all existing buildings;

The safeguarding of life and property from hazards of fire and explosion arising from storage, handling and use of hazardous substances, materials and devices.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 49, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 84, § 3.

Implement this section.

The council shall have access to records of the divisions and may require written or oral information from any officer or employee of the department when conducting investigations pursuant to W.S. 35-9-108(p) and

35-9-117

.

Except as provided under W.S.

35-9-121

(d),

35-9-121

.1(d)(ii) and 35-9-124(a)(ii), the council shall hear appeals to determine the suitability of alternate materials and type of construction and to interpret and grant variances from rules and regulations of the council.

The standards for liquefied petroleum gas installations shall be the current edition of NFPA 58 Liquefied Petroleum Gas Code and ANSI Z223.1/NFPA 54 National Fuel Gas Code. To the extent the standards for liquefied petroleum gas conflict with the standards prescribed by the International Fuel Gas Code, the NFPA 58 Liquefied Petroleum Gas Code and ANSI Z223.1/NFPA 54 National Fuel Gas Code control.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 84, § 3.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.6; Laws 1977, ch. 166, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

35-9-110

; Laws 1979, ch. 136, § 2; 1980, ch. 11, § 1; ch. 57, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 2003, ch. 49, §§ 2, 3; 2010, ch. 84, §§ 2, 3; 2017 ch. 164, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

For definition of “council,” see § 35-9-102(a)(iv).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted “the International Existing Building Code” in (a)(i); repealed former (a)(iii), which read: “Recommend minimum standards for qualification of inspectors for political subdivisions”; substituted “section” for “article” in (a)(iv); in (b), deleted “investigate the conduct of the divisions, shall” following “The council shall” and inserted “when conducting investigations pursuant to W.S. 35-9-108(p) and

35-9-117

”; and repealed former (e), which read: “To the extent that any provision in the International Fire Code, the International Building Code, the International Mechanical Code and the International Fuel Gas Code conflicts with the standards prescribed by the National Electrical Code, the National Electrical Code shall control.”

The 2017 amendment

, near the beginning of (c), added “35-9-121(d),

35-9-121

.1(d)(ii) and.”

Council authorized to hear variance appeals. —

Subsection (c) of this section, when read in conjunction with § 35-9-121(c), authorized the council to consider an oil company's request for a variance from a fire code regulation where the city did not establish its own appeal procedure to review decisions of the local fire chief. V-1 Oil Co. v. City of Rock Springs, 823 P.2d 1176,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 35-9-107.
Duties and powers of state fire marshal.

The state fire marshal shall:

Establish administrative policy for the department;

Adopt regulations in consultation with the board and council to implement this article, excluding the provisions of W.S.

35-9-106

and

35-9-124

;

Implement fire safety programs designed to minimize fire hazards and disasters and loss of life and property from these causes. These programs shall include:

Establishment and enforcement of fire safety and safety practices throughout the state;

Preventive inspection and corrective activities;

Coordination of fire safety programs with volunteer and paid fire companies and other state agencies and political subdivisions;

Critical analysis and evaluation of fire loss statistics to determine problems and solutions;

Coordination, development and implementation of training programs designed to assist fire fighters in all phases of fire prevention and suppression activities except the wild land and forestry division fire control programs implemented by the state forester; and

Acceptance testing on fire alarm systems, fire sprinkler systems and kitchen hood and duct suppression systems.

Inspect each state owned building not under the authority of a local governmental entity pursuant to W.S.

35-9-121

(b) and require conformance to the minimum standards of fire prevention, fire protection and public safety;

Inspect facilities or installations upon request by the owner. The department may charge reasonable fees not exceeding the cost of the inspection;

Upon request, assist the chief of a fire company or department, a fire marshal, a local building inspector, other state agencies or political subdivisions of the state or county fire wardens in fire prevention matters;

Keep a record of all fires which occur in the state, including the origin, facts, statistics and circumstances of the fire determined by investigation under this act [§§

35-9-101

through

35-9-130

]. The record, except for testimony given in the examination, shall be open for public inspection at all times;

Upon request, assist a municipality, county or other local governmental entity in exercising authority granted to that entity under W.S.

35-9-121

.

The state fire marshal may:

Subject to W.S.

35-9-121

(b) and

35-9-121

.1(d), enforce state laws not otherwise enforceable by another state agency concerning:

The prevention of fire;

The storage, sale and use of an explosive, combustible or other dangerous article in solid, liquid or gas form;

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 49, § 3.

The suppression of arson and investigation of fire and explosions.

Subject to W.S. 35-9-121(b), inspect public, business or industrial buildings and require conformance to standards of prevention and safety and of uses of premises as promulgated by the International Fire Code, the International Building Code, the International Mechanical Code and the International Fuel Gas Code;

Deputize a member of a fire department who is approved by the chief of his department, or a local building inspector approved by the local governmental entity, provided that the person is qualified to inspect, investigate and carry out orders for the state fire marshal under the rules adopted by the department;

Employ personnel and contract with appropriate personnel as necessary for the efficient performance of assigned duties.

The state fire marshal shall not interfere with the hookup of a utility to a new or remodeled building either during construction or after construction is completed, unless the state fire marshal determines that the hookup of a utility poses immediate danger to life or property.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.7; Laws 1977, ch. 166, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

35-9-116

,

35-9-117

,

35-9-119

,

35-9-121

,

35-9-130

; Laws 1979, ch. 136, §§ 1, 2; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1989, ch. 75, § 1; 1993, ch. 190, § 1; 2003, ch. 49, §§ 2, 3; 2008, ch. 4, § 1; 2010, ch. 84, § 2; 2017 ch. 164, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

For definitions of “department” and “council,” see §

35-9-102

.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted “and contract with appropriate personnel as” in (b)(iv).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(ii), substituted “Adopt” for “Enforce,” substituted “in consultation with the board and” for “promulgated by the,” and inserted “to implement this article, excluding the provisions of W.S.

35-9-106

and

35-9-124

”; and substituted “department” for “council” at the end of (b)(iii).

The 2017 amendment

, added (a)(viii); and in (b)(i), inserted “Subject to
W.S.

35-9-121

(b) and

35-9-121

.1(d),” and in (b)(ii), inserted “Subject to
W.S. 35-9-121(b).”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Regulation Review — Act II,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1980).

§ 35-9-108.
Plan review; procedure; fees.

Except as provided under subsections (h) and (q) of this section and W.S.

35-9-118

, prior to beginning any new construction, the remodeling of existing buildings or the installation of aboveground flammable or combustible fuel storage tanks, the owner or the owner’s designated representative shall submit plans to the state fire marshal for review of the proposed project for compliance with applicable fire and electrical safety standards for:

Buildings or structures owned or leased by the state or local governmental entities;

Public buildings over five thousand (5,000) square feet of total floor area including basement;

Multistory public buildings;

Buildings intended for use as child care centers housing more than ten (10) children;

Public bars, public lounges, restaurants, night clubs, lodge halls, theaters, churches or public meeting places regardless of size;

Public and private aboveground fuel dispensing facilities.

If the state fire marshal does not notify the sender in writing of violations of the fire or electrical safety standards within twenty-one (21) working days of receiving the plans, they are approved as submitted. If code deficiencies are discovered through inspection by the fire marshal during the construction or remodeling of buildings, the plan and plan review shall be amended to bring the building into compliance with applicable codes.

Plans which are disapproved may be corrected and resubmitted. The state fire marshal shall review only the corrections made in response to the violations cited in the initial review. If the state fire marshal does not notify the sender in writing of violations of the fire and electrical safety standards within ten (10) working days of receiving the corrected plans, they are approved as resubmitted.

The department shall collect fees for plan reviews and other inspections except as provided in subsections (q) and (r) of this section, in the amount provided in the 1997 Uniform Building Code and adjusted for inflation as adopted by rule or regulation by the department. Fees collected under this subsection shall be deposited into the general fund.

For publicly owned buildings, the department may charge fees not in excess of fees authorized under W.S. 35-9-108(d) to any entity for which it performs any plan inspection or review.

and (g) Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 49, § 3.

Nothing in this section shall apply to municipalities or counties which have received enforcement authority for fire safety standards under W.S.

35-9-121

.

Except as provided under subsections (h) and (q) of this section and W.S.

35-9-118

, no new construction or remodeling of buildings or installation of aboveground flammable or combustible fuel storage tanks shall begin until the state fire marshal has approved the plans for compliance with applicable fire and electrical safety standards.

If new construction or remodeling of buildings or installation of aboveground flammable or combustible fuel storage tanks is commenced without approved plans, the state fire marshal may order the construction, remodeling or installation to cease until plans are approved, subject to the requirements of subsection (m) of this section.

Orders issued by the state fire marshal pursuant to this section shall be served upon the owner in the manner provided for service of process by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure. The order shall require that the person served immediately cease certain activities until he has complied with the applicable statutory requirements. The order shall be in full force and effect from the time of service until the person complies with the statutory requirement as described in the order, or the order is revoked by the council. If the person fails to cease certain activities as required within forty-eight (48) hours of service, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Except as provided under subsections (h) and (q) of this section and W.S.

35-9-118

, after new construction or remodeling of buildings is completed, the state fire marshal shall inspect the building and determine conformance with the plan review or amended plan review. If he finds conformance, the state fire marshal shall issue a certificate of occupancy for a newly constructed building and a letter of compliance for a remodeled building. No newly constructed or remodeled building shall be used or occupied until the state fire marshal has issued a certificate of occupancy or letter of compliance. If a newly constructed or remodeled building is used or occupied prior to the issuance of a certificate of occupancy or letter of compliance, the state fire marshal shall order the use and occupancy of the building to cease until a certificate of occupancy or letter of compliance is issued, subject to the requirements of subsection (m) of this section.

Except as provided under subsections (h) and (q) of this section and W.S.

35-9-118

, after the installation of aboveground flammable or combustible fuel storage tanks is completed, the state fire marshal shall inspect the premises and determine conformance with the plan review. If he finds conformance, the state fire marshal shall issue a letter of compliance. No premises with aboveground flammable or combustible fuel storage tanks installed shall be used until the state fire marshal has issued a letter of compliance. If a premise with aboveground flammable or combustible fuel storage tanks installed is used prior to issuance of a letter of compliance, the state fire marshal shall order the use of the premises to cease until a letter of compliance is issued, subject to the requirements of subsection (m) of this section.

Any owner aggrieved by an order of the state fire marshal may appeal to the council within forty-eight (48) hours. The complaint shall be investigated immediately by direction of the council. Unless the order is revoked by the council, it shall remain in force and the owner shall comply.

A plan review is:

Not required for remodeling that is exempt from permitting under the International Code;

Required for remodeling that costs less than forty thousand dollars ($40,000.00) and affects a built-in fire protection system for the building, provided a fee of no more than fifty dollars ($50.00) per hour shall be paid to the department for the review;

Required for remodeling that costs forty thousand dollars ($40,000.00) or more, provided the department shall collect a fee pursuant to subsection (d) of this section;

Not required to be submitted to the state fire marshal if the plan review is submitted to a local governmental entity which has been granted sole plan review authority pursuant to W.S. 35-9-121(b).

There shall be no inspection fees for school buildings.

Plan reviews may be submitted in phases so that work may begin on the first phase of a project upon approval of the plans for that phase. Subsequent work may begin on each successive phase as plans are approved for each successive phase. Plans for fire alarm systems and fire sprinkler systems shall be submitted as successive phase plans after the initial plans are approved.

Subsections (a) through (s) shall not apply to remodeling that is exempt under subsection (q).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.8; Laws 1977, ch. 166, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

35-9-106

,

35-9-116

; Laws 1979, ch. 136, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 2000, ch. 77, § 1; 2003, ch. 49, §§ 2, 3; 2008, ch. 4, § 1; 2009, ch. 85, § 1; 2010, ch. 84, § 2; 2014 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 164, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

For definition of “department,” see § 35-9-102(a)(v).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, deleted “plan review and” following “no” in (r).

The 2009 amendment,

rewrote (e) which
read: “There shall be no plan review fee for publicly owned buildings.”

Laws 2009, ch. 85, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added the second sentence of (b); substituted “department” for “council” at the end of the first sentence of (d); inserted “or amended plan review” in the first sentence of (n); substituted “forty thousand dollars ($40,000.00)” for “twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00)” in (q)(ii) and (q)(iii); added (s) and redesignated former (s) as (t) and made related change.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (e), deleted “other than school buildings” following “For publicly owned buildings.”

The 2017 amendment

, added “Except as provided under subsections (h) and (q) of this section and
W.S.

35-9-118

” to the beginning of (a), (j), (n), and (o); in (a), deleted “except as provided under subsection (q) of this section,” which formerly followed “existing buildings”; added (q)(iv); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it is set out in the printed acts.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 312, effective July 1, 2004, provides that, notwithstanding W.S. 35-9-108(e), for the period beginning July 1, 2004 and ending June 30, 2006, the state department of fire prevention and electrical safety is authorized to charge fees not in excess of fees authorized under W.S. 35-9-108(d) to any entity for which it performs any plan inspection or review.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Regulation Review — Act II,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1980).

§ 35-9-109.
Investigation of fires; notification to fire marshal; powers of fire marshal.

The county fire warden or chief of the fire department of a city, town, county or fire district shall investigate the cause, origin and circumstances of each fire occurring in the city, town, county or district that was reported or subject to emergency response, by which property has been destroyed or damaged.

The officer investigating a fire shall notify the state fire marshal and within one (1) week of the fire shall furnish him a written statement of all facts relating to its cause and origin, and other information required by forms provided by the state fire marshal.

The state fire marshal may investigate the origin or circumstances of any fire or explosion or any attempt to cause a fire or explosion.

In performing the duties imposed by this act [§§

35-9-101

through

35-9-130

], the state fire marshal may:

Enter and examine any building or premises where any fires or attempt to cause fires occurred;

Enter any building adjacent to that in which a fire or attempt to cause a fire occurred; and

Take full control and custody of the buildings and premises until his examination and investigations are completed.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.9; W.S. 1977, §

35-9-118

; Laws 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1989, ch. 75, § 1; 2003, ch. 49, § 2.

Exigencies of situation determine whether warrantless search by police or firemen is permissible.

Shaffer v. State, 640 P.2d 88,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1982).

And if warrantless entry constitutional, warrantless seizure of evidence constitutional. —

Officials need no warrant to remain in a building for a reasonable time to investigate the cause of a blaze after it has been extinguished. And if the warrantless entry to put out the fire and determine its cause is constitutional, the warrantless seizure of evidence while inspecting the premises for these purposes also is constitutional. Shaffer v. State, 640 P.2d 88,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Strickland v. State, 2004 WY 91, 94 P.3d 1034,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(2004).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility, in criminal case, of evidence discovered by warrantless search in connection with fire investigation — post-Tyler cases, 31 ALR4th 194.

§ 35-9-110.
Investigation of fires; testimony; subpoena; arrest.

The state fire marshal may take testimony under oath and cause the testimony to be reduced to writing.

When the examination discloses that a fire or explosion was of incendiary origin, the state fire marshal may arrest the supposed incendiary or cause him to be arrested and charged with the crime. The state fire marshal shall transmit a copy of the testimony to the district attorney for the county where the fire, explosion or attempt occurred.

The state fire marshal may:

Subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance before him;

Cause to be produced papers he requires in the examination; and

Administer oaths and affirmations to persons appearing as witnesses before him.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.10; W.S. 1977, §

35-9-119

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to punishment for perjury, see §

6-5-301

.

§ 35-9-111.
Certain structures declared nuisance; repair or demolition; procedure.

A building or structure is a public nuisance if it is especially liable to fire and endangers people, buildings or property in the vicinity. If the state fire marshal, county fire warden, or the chief of a fire department or district finds that a building or structure is especially liable to fire and endangers people, buildings or property in the vicinity, the officer shall order the structure to be repaired, torn down or demolished, all materials removed and all dangerous conditions remedied.

The order shall be in writing, state the grounds and be filed in the office of the clerk of the district court of the county in which the building or structure is situated. A copy of the order shall be served in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure upon the owner and any occupants of the building or structure with a written notice that the order has been filed and will be put in force unless the owner or occupant files his objections or answer with the clerk of the district court within the time specified in W.S.

35-9-112

. A copy of the order shall be posted in a conspicuous place upon the building or structure.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.11; W.S. 1977, §

35-9-122

; Laws 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1989, ch. 75, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to nuisances generally, see §§

6-6-201

through

6-6-209

.

As to service of process, pleadings, motions and orders, see Rules 4 and 5, W.R.C.P.

§ 35-9-112.
Certain structures declared nuisance; answer to notice or order.

Within twenty (20) days of service of an order under W.S. 35-9-111(b) the owner or occupant may file with the clerk of the district court and serve upon the council an answer denying the existence of any of the allegations in the order. If no answer is filed and served, the court shall affirm the order of condemnation and fix a time in which the order shall be enforced. If an answer is filed and served, the court shall hear and determine the issues raised as provided in W.S.

35-9-113

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.12; W.S. 1977, §

35-9-123

; Laws 1983, ch. 97, § 1.

Cross references. —

For definition of “council,” see § 35-9-102(a)(iv).

§ 35-9-113.
Certain structures declared nuisance; hearing.

Upon application of the state fire marshal, county fire warden or the chief of a fire department or district, the court shall order a hearing within twenty (20) days from the date of the filing of the answer. If the court sustains the order, the court shall fix a time within which the order shall be enforced. Otherwise the court shall annul or set aside the order of condemnation.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.13; W.S. 1977, §

35-9-124

; Laws 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1989, ch. 75, § 1.

§ 35-9-114.
Certain structures declared nuisance; appeal.

An appeal from the judgment of the district court may be taken by the owner or occupant in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.14; W.S. 1977, §

35-9-125

; Laws 1983, ch. 97, § 1.

Cross references. —

For Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure, see

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated

.

§ 35-9-115.
Certain structures declared nuisance; sale of materials; expenses constitute lien; disposition of proceeds.

If the owner or occupant fails to comply with an order of condemnation within the time fixed by the court, the state fire marshal, county fire warden or the chief of a fire department or district shall alter, repair or demolish the building or structure in accordance with the order. If a building or structure is demolished in accordance with the order, the state fire marshal, county fire warden or the chief of a fire department or district may dispose of the salvaged materials at public auction upon five (5) days posted notice. He shall keep an accurate account of the expenses incurred in carrying out the order. He shall report his action and present a statement of the expenses incurred by him and the amount received from any salvage sale to the court for approval and allowance. The court shall examine, correct if necessary and allow the expense account. The amount allowed constitutes a lien against the real estate on which the building or structure is or was situated and if the amount is not paid by the owner or occupant within six (6) months after the amount has been examined and approved by the court, the real estate shall be sold under court order by the county sheriff in the manner provided by law for the sale of real estate upon execution. The proceeds of the sale shall be paid into the state treasury. If the amount received as salvage or on sale exceeds the expense incurred by the state fire marshal, county fire warden or the chief of the fire department or district, the court shall direct the payment of the surplus to the previous owner for his use and benefit.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.15; W.S. 1977, §

35-9-126

; Laws 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1989, ch. 75, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to legal procedures governing the sale of real estate under execution, see §

1-18-101

et seq.

§ 35-9-116.
Removal of combustible material; remedy of flammable conditions.

If the state fire marshal, county fire warden or the chief of a fire department or district finds combustible materials or flammable conditions or fire hazards in a building or on premises subject to an inspection and the materials or conditions are dangerous to the safety of the buildings, premises or public, the officer shall order the materials to be removed or conditions remedied. The order shall be in writing and shall be served upon the owner, lessee, agent or occupant. A person who is served and fails to comply within twenty-four (24) hours after service, unless the order prescribes a longer time, is guilty of a misdemeanor. The material may be removed or the condition corrected at the expense of any person served. The state fire marshal, county fire warden or the chief of a fire department or district may maintain actions for the recovery of the expenses. In the event of a hazard of immediate life threatening severity, the state fire marshal, county fire warden or the chief of a fire department or district may order evacuation of a building or area and may implement emergency measures to protect life and property and to remove the hazard.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.16; W.S. 1977, §

35-9-127

; Laws 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1989, ch. 75, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to penalties for misdemeanors where not prescribed by statute, see §

6-10-103

.

§ 35-9-117.
Removal of combustible material; appeal to council.

An owner or occupant aggrieved by an order of an officer under W.S.

35-9-116

may appeal to the council within forty-eight (48) hours. The cause of the complaint shall be investigated immediately by direction of the council. Unless the order is revoked by the council, it shall remain in force and the owner or occupant shall comply.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.17; W.S. 1977, §

35-9-128

; Laws 1983, ch. 97, § 1.

Cross references. —

For definition of “council,” see § 35-9-102(a)(iv).

§ 35-9-118.
Exceptions.

W.S.

35-9-106

through

35-9-117

do not apply to:

Farms or ranches of forty (40) acres or more on deeded land;

County memorial hospitals, state-owned health care institutions, hospital districts, private hospitals and other health care facilities, except as permitted pursuant to W.S.

35-9-121

.1;

Mines or their appurtenant facilities, oil field operations, petroleum refineries and liquefied petroleum gas facilities;

Railway shops, railway buildings (except those used for public assembly, cafeterias, dormitories, etc.), rolling stock and locomotive equipment;

Automotive equipment employed by a railway, gas, electric or communication utility in the exercise of its function as a public utility.

Nothing in this section prohibits the state fire marshal from assisting, upon request, another state agency, or an owner or operator of property listed in subsection (a) of this section or a municipality, county or other local governmental entity in exercising authority granted to that entity under W.S.

35-9-121

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239,§ 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.18; Laws 1977, ch. 166,§ 1; W.S. 1977, §

35-9-129

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1997, ch. 146, § 1; 2003, ch. 49, § 2; 2017 ch. 164, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, in (b), added “or a municipality, county or other local governmental entity in exercising authority granted to that entity under
W.S.

35-9-121

” to the end.

§ 35-9-119.
Duties of chief electrical inspector.

The chief electrical inspector shall:

Enforce the minimum requirements for electrical installations except in localities which have received enforcement authority for electrical safety standards under W.S. 35-9-121(a);

Aid cities, towns, counties and inspectors in understanding the National Electrical Code;

Distribute copies of the National Electrical Code at cost;

Interpret the National Electrical Code; and

Supervise deputy electrical inspectors.

The chief electrical inspector may investigate electrocution incidents that occur in the state pursuant to W.S.

35-9-131

.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the chief electrical inspector, the chief electrical inspector shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.19; W.S. 1977, §§ 35-9-132, 35-9-134; Laws 1979, ch. 136, § 1; 1980, ch. 57, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 2010, ch. 84, § 2; 2017 ch. 164, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to per diem and traveling expenses of state employees, see §

9-3-102

.

As to National Electric Code, see 29 CFR § 1910.309.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (b) and (c).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i), substituted “35-9-121(a)” for “35-9-121” at the end.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it is set out in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Regulation Review — Act II,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1980).

§ 35-9-120.
Minimum requirements for electrical installations; permits; inspections; fees.

The installation of electric equipment in or on buildings, mobile homes and premises shall be made subject to the applicable minimum requirements of the National Electrical Code. To the extent that any provision in the International Fire Code, the International Building Code, the International Mechanical Code, the International Existing Building Code and the International Fuel Gas Code conflicts with the standards prescribed by the National Electrical Code, the National Electrical Code shall control.

Subject to W.S. 35-9-121(b), the chief electrical inspector and his deputies:

Have the right of ingress or egress to all buildings or other structures owned or leased by the state or local governmental entities during reasonable working hours to make electrical inspections;

May inspect any building or structure:

With a search warrant issued by a district court after a finding of probable cause that there is a violation of state law regarding electrical installations; or

At any time during construction and within thirty (30) days after completion of the installation for which an electrical wiring permit was issued or an electrical plan review was performed.

Shall inspect any building or structure within five (5) business days of the request of the owner or the general or electrical contractor installing the electrical equipment.

For any requested electrical inspection conducted or electrical wiring permit issued by the chief electrical inspector or his deputy, a fee established by the department by rule shall be paid by the person or contractor making the request. The electrical wiring permit fee shall be waived for anyone requesting and paying for an electrical inspection. The fees established by the department shall not exceed the following:

Electrical inspection fees for requested inspections:

Each residential unit . . . . . $ 20.00
plus $.50 per ampere rating of the electrical service;

Mobile home services . . . . . $ 20.00
plus $.50 per ampere rating of mobile home;

Temporary services . . . . . $ 40.00 each;

Remodels of residential units . . . . . $ 20.00
plus 2% of the value of any electrical installation included in the remodel;

All other electrical installations . . . . . $ 20.00
plus $.50 per ampere rating of the electrical service;

Reinspections . . . . . $ 50.00
plus $.20 per ampere rating of the electrical service.

Electrical wiring permit fees . . . . . $50.00

Inspection fees pursuant to paragraph (c)(i) of this section shall be charged for requested inspections made on installations that are not under new construction or remodeling.

No person shall install electrical equipment in new construction or remodeling, if the remodeling requires a public utility to connect or disconnect and restore electrical power, of a building, mobile home or premises without obtaining an electrical wiring permit. No public utility shall energize an electrical service for an electrical installation which requires an electrical wiring permit until the person responsible for the electrical installation has obtained an electrical wiring permit. A utility may energize an electrical service in an emergency situation without proof that an electrical wiring permit has been obtained, however the utility shall notify the department of the action as soon as possible, but in no case later than five (5) days following the date that the electrical service was energized. Electrical wiring permits shall be issued by the chief electrical inspector upon request. Each permit shall explain procedures and costs for permits and requested inspections conducted by the chief electrical inspector or his deputy electrical inspectors. This subsection does not apply to municipalities and counties granted local enforcement authority for electrical safety standards under W.S. 35-9-121(a) and to exempt installations under W.S. 35-9-123(a)(ii) through (v).

Sixty percent (60%) of the fees collected pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall be deposited in a separate account for the purpose of providing additional state electrical inspectors. Forty percent (40%) of the fees collected pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall be deposited in the general fund.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.20; Laws 1976, ch. 14, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 35-9-134, 35-9-140; Laws 1979, ch. 136, § 1; 1980, ch. 57, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1993, ch. 190, § 1; 1999, ch. 128, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2010, ch. 84, § 2; 2017 ch. 164, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

For definition of “board,” see § 35-9-102(a)(iii).

As to National Electrical Code, see 29 CFR § 1910.309.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (f) substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the special revenue fund.”

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added the second sentence of (a); substituted “department” for “board” twice in the introductory language of (c); in (c)(ii), deleted “Effective July 1, 1993” at the beginning and substituted “$50.00” for “$30.00”; deleted “of fire prevention and electrical safety” following “notify the department” in the third sentence of (e); in (f), substituted “Sixty percent (60%)” for “Fifty percent (50%)” in the first sentence and “Forty percent (40%)” for “Fifty percent (50%)” in the second sentence.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (b), at the beginning, added “Subject to
W.S.

35-9-121

(b)”; and in (e), near the end, substituted “35-9-121(a)” for “35-9-121.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Applied

in

Moxley v. Laramie Bldrs., Inc., 600 P.2d 733,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 459

(Wyo. 1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for injury or death resulting when object is manually brought into contact with, or close proximity to, electric line, 33 ALR4th 809.